tex/hyph-is.tex
% title: Hyphenation patterns for Icelandic
% copyright: Copyright (C) 1988, 2004 Jörgen Pind
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
% language:
%     name: Icelandic
%     tag: is
% authors:
%   -
%     name: Jörgen Pind
%     affiliation: Institute of Lexicography, Univ. of Iceland
%     contact: jorgen (at) lexis.hi.is
% licence:
%     name: LPPL
%     version: 1.2
%     or_later: true
%     url: http://www.latex-project.org/lppl.txt
% changes:
%     - Nov 2 1988: Latest pattern change
%     - Mar 2 2004: Uploaded a new version to CTAN, with a clarified license
%           statement, at the request of the author, Jörgen Pind.
%           Kristinn Gylfason (kristgy@ieee.org)
%
\patterns{
.a2a
.a2b
.ab1e
.a3bi
.a2d1
.að3a2
.aðk2
.að3l2a
.að1s
.a2e
.a2f
.af1e
.af3le
.af1lé
.af4lið.
.af1lo
.af1ló
.af1læ
.af1n2
.af1o
.af1r
.af1s2
.af1tal
.af1u
.af1y
.af1æ
.af1ö
.a2g
.ag1at
.ag1e
.ag2n1
.agr1
.a2h
.a3ho
.ai2
.a2k
.ak1ab
.ak1j
.ak1l
.ak1re
.a2l
.al1a
.ala2s
.alb4ína
.al1e
.al1ið
.al2ise
.allarn4
.al1n
.al1o
.al1ó
.al1s
.als2e
.als2v
.alta2
.altal1
.al3u
.al1ú
.al1y
.al1æ
.a2m
.am3a2g1
.am3ar
.am1e
.am1o
.am2r
.am2s
.a2n
.an2d
.an3e
.angi2
.ang2v1
.an3i
.an1kan
.an3n2es
.an3o
.an1ó
.a2p
.ap1ol
.appar1
.app2l
.ar1ab
.ar2f
.arf1r
.ar3i
.ari2s
.ar2k
.ar2mag
.ar2mar
.ar2n
.ar1ó
.ar2s1
.ar2t1
.art3u
.a4s
.ask1e
.ask1o
.ask1v
.asp3
.as2s
.ast2an
.ast1e
.as1ú
.a2t
.at1a
.at1o
.a3tó
.a3tro
.at1ró
.at1y
.au3f
.aum1u
.aus1a
.auth1
.a2v
.av1a
.av1es
.av1i
.a2þ
.a3þa
.á1f
.á2fi
.á1ga
.á3hö
.á1k2
.á1lag
.á1lan
.á1lap
.á3las
.á1lau
.ál3g
.á1li
.á1ly
.á1lö
.á1m2
.á2m3a
.á1nau
.á1ny
.á1rá
.á1re
.á1rið
.á1ró
.ár1r
.ár2st
.ár2s3v
.á1san
.á2sen
.á2s1ke
.á4skinn
.á2skj
.á2sle
.á2spre
.ásta1f4
.á1stan
.á2stj
.á1strí
.á1stu
.á2s1y
.á1ta
.á2to
.á1tr
.á3un
.á1v4
.á2valt
.á1æ
.b4
.b2a2
.band1s2
.ba4s
.bat2a
.ber1r
.b2i
.bikk1
.bikk3j
.b2í
.bí1sk
.bí1tal
.b2l4
.b2ó
.br2
.b2s
.b2u4
.bur4s
.bust1
.c2a
.c2e
.co2
.c2u
.d2a2
.dag1l
.dag1r
.dan2s
.dav3
.d2e
.dent1
.d2i2
.dil2
.din2
.dir2
.div1
.d2í
.d2m2
.d2o
.d2r2
.dra2
.dram2b
.d2u2
.d2v
.d2w
.d2y
.e2a
.e2b
.e2d
.e2f
.eff3
.ef2s
.eið3i
.ei3mu
.ein1d
.eins2t
.ek1i
.el2f
.elf3a
.el2l
.ell1e
.el2r
.el2s
.elsk1e
.em3a
.em1bal
.em2b1e
.e1ól
.ep2l
.er3a
.er2g
.e1rik
.erk4
.erki1
.erl2
.er3li
.er3lí
.er2m
.er2r
.e2s
.es4s
.ess1e
.e2t
.et1a
.et2h
.etr3
.et3u
.e2u
.ey1f2
.ey1m4a
.él1i
.f4
.f2a2
.fab1e
.fag1e
.fal1i
.fat3í
.f2á
.f2e
.f2i2
.fir2m
.fis2h1e
.f2í
.fj4
.f2l2
.fla2
.for1k2
.f2r2
.fra4
.fræð4is
.fræ1nó
.f2u
.fug2
.fu2m
.fur2s
.f2y
.g4
.g2a2
.gafl3
.gal1a
.gal1e
.ga4s
.g2á
.g2i2
.g2í
.gja2
.g2l2
.gla2
.glas1k
.glat3
.glu2
.g2n2
.gná3
.g2o
.gór1
.gós2
.g2r2
.gri2
.g2u2
.gul1an
.gul1ö
.gust3
.g2v4
.h2e
.hel4stan
.h2í
.h2l2
.hn2
.h2o
.h2ó
.hr2
.hu2
.h2ú
.id2
.ið2ug
.i2l
.il2l
.ill1æ
.ilm1
.il1p
.i2m
.ims1
.indí2u
.in2g
.ing1er
.ingj1
.in4n1
.inn2i
.inni1s
.ir2r1
.is1lan
.i2v1
.iv3a
.í1f2
.í3fe
.í1ga
.í1gi
.í1gj
.í1k
.ík2a
.í1l
.í3le
.í1mið
.í1mil
.ín2
.í3ná
.í3ne
.íng3
.ín3u
.í1ny
.ír1ó
.ír2s
.í3sen
.í3set
.ís1kei
.ís1kul
.ís1l
.í2sn
.ís1nú
.í2s1on
.í1stan
.ís1te
.í2str
.í2stæ
.í1sú
.í2sö
.í1tak
.ít1ali
.í1tö
.ív2
.í2v3a
.í3vaf
.í3vas
.j2a2
.jap1
.jar2m
.jas3i
.jár2
.j2e
.j2i
.jó2k
.jó1m2u
.jó2n
.jó4se
.j2u2
.jú2
.k4
.k2a2
.kab3
.kal1e
.kal1ið
.kal1ín
.kara2
.kar2b1í
.kar2la
.karl1e
.kar2s
.kas1e
.kat1e
.kav3
.ká2l
.kál3m2
.k2f
.k2h
.k2i
.kis1k
.kj4
.kjal1a
.kjark3
.k2l2
.kla2
.klak1l
.klav1
.k2n2
.k2o
.k2ó2
.kót3
.k2r2
.kra2
.k2u2
.kunn1
.k2v2
.kvið1r
.l4
.l2a2
.laf1l
.lafr1
.lag1e
.lam1að
.lar2f
.las1ú
.lav1
.lá2g
.lág1e
.l2e
.l2i2
.lib1
.lí2b1
.lín1
.l2o2
.ló2fa
.ló1gr
.ló2lí
.l2u2
.l2y
.læ1v
.m4
.m2a2
.mag3i
.maj1
.mal1an
.mal1e
.mand1
.man1s
.mar1it
.mar2kv
.mar4mel
.mask3
.mat1af
.má2
.mál1an
.málf2
.más1
.m2e2
.m2i2
.min2g
.m2í
.mín3
.mo2
.m2ó
.m2u2
.muðl2i
.mur2k
.mus1u
.m2ú
.m2ö
.n2a2
.ná1ly
.ná1s
.n2e
.nef1l
.nert3
.nes1k4
.n2i2
.n2í
.n2o
.n3ox
.n2ó
.n2u2
.n2y
.ný1f
.næ2
.o2f
.of1e
.ofs2
.of1sin
.of1sv
.of1tr
.oft1s
.of3u2
.ofur1
.ole3
.o2n
.op1a
.or2d3
.ore1
.or2g1
.or2k
.or2m
.o2s
.ot2h3
.ó1
.ó3a2f
.ó3a2l1a
.ó3ar
.ó3b2a
.ód2
.óf4
.ófa2
.ó3fr
.óg2
.ó3ge
.ók2
.óla2f
.ó3la2st1
.ó3lav
.ó3le
.ól2g
.ól2i
.ó2l1ín
.óls2
.ól1us
.óm2
.ó2mað
.ó2m3an.
.óm4ari
.óm3s
.ó3ne
.ón1g
.ón2í
.ó2p1a
.ó3par
.ór2
.ó3sað
.ó2sala
.ós2et
.ó3sj
.ós2k
.ó4skaði
.ó2sla
.ós2le
.ós2m
.ósn2
.óst2
.ós2var
.ó3sy
.ót2
.óta2
.ó3tr
.óvi2
.p2a2
.pam1
.par2k1
.par2m
.pask3
.past1
.pá2
.p2e
.pé2
.p2f
.p2h
.p2i2
.pil2
.pin2
.pist1
.p2í
.pí2s
.pj2
.p2l2
.pla2
.plast1
.po2
.pr2
.p2s
.p2u2
.r2a4
.rad1í
.raf1l
.ram2bu
.rask3
.rá2r1
.r2e
.re1g2is
.r2i2
.risp3
.r2í
.rí2k
.r2o
.ro2g
.ró1n
.r2u2
.rú4m
.r2v
.s4
.s2a4
.sadó3
.s2á
.sál1f
.s2e
.s2f
.s2h
.s2i
.si2g
.si2k
.sim1o
.sis2
.s2í
.sí1gi
.s2j2
.sjar2
.s2k4
.ska2
.sker3l2
.ski2
.skj2
.skr2
.sku2
.skul1i
.s2l2
.sla2
.slav3
.s2m
.smá1la
.smæ1l2
.s2n2
.sna2
.s2o2
.s2p4
.spr2
.s2t4
.sta2
.stal1í
.star2f
.str2
.s2u2
.sus1
.s2ú
.s2v
.s2y
.sæl2a
.t4
.t2a2
.tab3
.taf2l
.tak1v
.tal1a
.tal1i
.tan2
.tar2f3
.tav1
.t2á
.tá1li
.t2e
.te1ru
.tes2
.t2h2
.thol3
.t2i2
.til1
.till2
.tils2
.t2í
.tív3
.t2o2
.tóp1
.t2r2
.t2s2
.t2u2
.tug2a1
.t2ú
.t2v
.tví3m
.tyr2
.t2ý
.uf2
.uff3
.u2m1
.um3k
.um3s
.und2ra
.un2g
.unn3
.ur2b
.ur2g1
.ur2t
.ut3a
.utan1g
.ú2f
.úf1j
.ú1k2
.úl3u
.úr1
.úrk2
.ú2t
.út3l
.út3n
.ú3tó
.úts2
.v2a2
.vara1f
.var3f
.var2p
.var3tá
.veld2a1
.vi2
.ví2g
.ví2k
.vín1
.v2o
.v2u
.x2e
.y2a
.yð2v
.y2e
.yf3i
.yl3s
.yrl2
.ý2s
.z2a
.þ2a
.þ2ó
.æð3isk
.æð2ist
.æg2isv
.æt2is
.æt2l3
.æ2val
.æ1vara
.æ1ve
.öfl1
.öfl3u
.öf3u2
.ögr1
.ökr3
.öl3s2
.öl1t2
.öl3ví
.önn3us
.ör1a
.ör1kv
.ör2lin
.ör3s2
.ör1t
.ör1u
a1a
a2a2a
aa2b
aabb1
aab1e
a2ac
a2ae
aa2f
aaf1r
a2a2g1
aal2m
aa1lu
a2ard
a2as
aat1
a2aú
a1á
aá2b
aá2f
aá2g
aá2h
aák2
aá2n
aá2r
aá2s
aá2t
aá2v4
a1b
2ab.
ab1ad
1a2bam
a2b1ana
ab1ant
ab3ar3b
abas2i
ab1att
a3bau
a2bb
a2bc
a2bd
2abe
ab1erd
3abesk
1a2bh
1abi.
1abid
4abið
a3bit
1abía
ab1ílt
ab2ínu
1ab1ís
ab1íta
ab1íti
1abíu
a3bló
ablóð2i
a3blö
a2bm
2abo
ab1orr
a3bou
ab1ór
abram2
abramb1
abr1ami
abr3ik
a2bs
ab1si
ab2sk
ab1us1t
2abú
a3búb
ab1úla
ab1úle
a2bw
2abæ
2abö
ac1e
ach1
ac1i
ac1o
ac1u
a1d
ad1a2b
1adaf
2adag
a3dai
ad2an
a2db
a2dc
a2d2d
a2d1en
1ader
a2det
a2df
ad2i3d2
ad3ie
ad3ine
a3diu
a2dí
ad1íka
a3díl
a3dís
2adís.
ad1ísu
a2d2l1
ad3li
a2dm
ad3mi
ad2mí
a2d2n
ad1or
ad1ot
ad2r
adra2
adr1il
adr1ón
adr2u
a2ds
a2dt
ad2u
adul1
a3dúm
ad1ús
ad2vö
a2dw
2adö
2aðag
2aðak
aðal1ei
aða1rus
aðg2
a2ði
að3ir
2aðirn
1aðis
að1j
aðja2
að2ki
2aðm
að2ma
aðm3ars
að2m1u
aðr1aka
aðr1aki
aðr1ek
aðr1ik
aðr1ok
að1sá
að2skj
að2sp
aðs1tal
aðs1v
að2sve
2aðt
a2ðu
1aðu.
að1v4
a1e
a2eb
aeð2
aeðl1
ael2
ael3i
a2e1o
aepl1
aes3s
a2ew
a1é
2afa
af1ald
af1ali
af1alu
af1an
af2ang
af3angu
a1f2ant
af3ar
afar1f
a1fat
af1au
af1áh
af1ál
af1ás
2afe
af1ei
aferl1
af1ert
af1ets
af3eyr
af1ét
a2ff
af1fa
af1fu
afg2
af3gr
a1fiðr
af3ik.
a1fil
af1ild
af1irn
a1firr
a1fis
afisk3
af1ist
a1fit
2afí
af1íkl
af1ína
af1íó
af1ír
af1ít
2a1fj2
af3ju
1afkö
af1lag
3aflam
af1lang
1aflasp
1aflat
2aflau
af1laus
1aflav
1aflaþ
af1lá
2afleg
2afley
a2fli
af1lim
af1lí
2aflo
aflog2
af1lop
a1fló
a1flu
af1lur
af1lúð
af1lúk
af1lý
a1flæ
af1lög
af3mu
a2fn
2afn.
2afna
afn1au
afn1d
2afn3i
1afnot
af1ný
afn1æ
2afo
af1of
af2ol
a3fos
2afó
a1fr
af1rás
af1rei
af1reki
af1ré
af1ris
af2r1í
af1ræn
af1rös
a2fs
af1sa
af2s1eð
af3sí
af3skj
af1sl
af1sn
af1s2u
af1sú
a2ft
afta1f
af1tau
aft2í
2afug
2aful
a1fun
1afurð
afur1n
afur1t
a1fut
af1úld
2afý
af1öld
af1önd
aför1
2agal
a1gald
ag1alf
ag1als
a2gand
1agaó
2agar
ag2aran
ag2a1re
agar2m
ag2a1ro
a1g2arp
ag2arö
aga1sta
ag1ats
a1gá
ag2át
2age
ag1ef
age1in
a3gel
ag1era
ag1erh
a2g1eri
ag1erm
a2g1ers
agerv3
2agg
agg1at.
agg3i
ag1gj
ag1go
a2gh
a1gib
a1gif
a1gig
a1gil
a1gim
ag2ir
1agit
2a1gj
agjár2
a1glam
agl1an
ag1lán
ag2lé
ag1lis
a1glit
ag1lík
a1gló
aglós2
2a1glu
ag1lyk
ag1löð
agm4
1agnac
agn1d2
a1gneg
agn1ú
ag1ný
ag1on
ag1or
a1gó
a1gr
ag1reg
agri1s
ag1ræ
ag2ske
ag2skj
agsla2
ags1lu
ag2spá
ag2spó
ag2spr
ag2s3vi
ag2sö
a1guð
a1guf
a1g2ul
ag3ur
a1gus
a1gut
ag1úl
agv4
ag1yr
a1h
1ah.
2ahá
1a2hd
ahelg1
1a2hg
a2hm
ah2ó
ahóf2s
1ahu.
a2ia
a2id
a1ið
aik1
ail1e
ai2n
a1inn
a2ir1
1airs
ai3so
a1ist
a1iz
a1í
aí2b
1aík2
aí2l1í
a2ím
aís1
aív2a
aí2þ
a1j
aj1as
aj1es
a2j1o
ajó2
aj1ón1
aj2u
ajöklin4
a1kaðl
aka1g
a2kale
a2kalí
ak1alo
ak1aó
aka1pl
a1karl
ak3arn
a1k2art
ak1astu
aka1ta
2a1kaz
2a1ká2
2a1ke
akeðj2a
akeðjunn4
a4keðjur
ak1el.
ak1ett
ak3ið
ak1il2
a1k2ing
a1kip
a1k2is
a1kí
ak1ís
2a1kj
a2k2k
akka1s
akk1i
ak3ko
akk1sá
akk1t
akk1u
akk3us
ak1kvö
ak2lap
a1klas
ak1lás
ak1li
ak2lif
a1klo
a1kló
a1klu
2a2km
ak3má
a1knap
a1k2ná
2akni
a1knú
ak1ný
a1ko
ak1op.
ak1orð
ak3ov
2a1kó
akó3m
akr1ana
ak1rau
ak1ráð
ak1rek
akr3íl
ak1róm
ak1r2u
a1krö
a2ks
ak2san
ak2sei
ak4s1el
ak2s1il
ak2skr
ak2s1m
aks1n
ak2s1ú
ak1s2van
a2kt
ak1tal
ak1tam
ak1tau
ak1tei
1aktó
ak1tr2
aku2
a1k2uð
a1kuf
a1kuk
a1kul
a1k2un
a1k2us
a1kú
1akúd
a1kv
ak1vat
ak1vör
a1ky
a1ký
a1kæ
2a1kö
akörf1
ak1ötu
al2ab
1al1ac
al3að
a2laf
al1afl
al1afþ
a1lag
3a4laí
al1akí
al3amí
al3amo
a1lamp
al3anc
a1land
a3lang
al3ano
al3ans
al3ará
al3are
al4arei
ala2rey
ala1sn
a3lass
al3ast.
a2lat
al1at.
ala1ta
al1atb
al1atg
al3ato
al1atv
2a1lau
al1auð
a1lá2
al1áf
al1ágó
al1áh
2aláki
al1ákv
al1ál
2alán
al1ár
al1ást
al1átt
al1áv
a2ld
al1d2ans
aldin1g2
ald1jö
al2dreg
ald1rek
ald1ris
ald2sei
alds1ke
aldur1
aldur3n2
2ale
al1ed
al1ef
al1eigi
al1ein
al1el
3a2l1em
al1en.
al1ent
a3lep
al3er
3alera
3al1ett
al1ey.
al1eyg
a1lé
2alét
al1f2
al3fr
a2l1g
alg2a
al3ge
1algí
al3ia
al1ib
a1liði
a1liðs
al1ie
ali1k2
a3like
a1lim
a2lin.
2a1lind
al3ine
a1lip
ali3sei
al1isk
1alis2m1
a1lit
a3liv
a1lí
alí2a
a2l1íni
1alío
1al1ís
al2ísa
a1lj
al1j4a
a2l1já
2aljó
a2lk
al1kal
al1kap
al1ká
al1kj
al1k2u
al3kvi
a2ll
all1d
2aller
all1es.
all1i
al1ljó
all1o
all2sko
all2tei
all3u
all1ær
al1m
al2man.
alm4ar
alm2i
al2m1o
a2ln
alna1s
a1lo
al1ofn
2alog
al1om
al1opp
a1lóð
al1óf
a2lóg
al1ó2h
al1óna
a1lóni
al1ór
1al1ót
alp2ar
al1pi
al1pu
a2ls
al1sak
al2sei
al2sel
als1ett
al2s1ín
als1kal
1alskæ
al1s2len
al1smj
als1óm
als2pa
alst2
al1sug
a2lt
alt1sv
al1t2un
1altær
al1u
a1lub
a1luf
a1luk
alu2m
a1l2un
al3ur
a1lúa
2alúg
al1úm
al1ún
a1lús
al1úte
al1útt
a2lv
2a1ly
2a1lý
2a1læ
al1æð.
a3læp
al1æs
al1ætt
2a1lö
a2l1öf
alögg2
al1ör
ama1c
a1mag
a3magn
am1akk
am1aks
am1al
a3malu
am3al1æ
a3mam
am3ana
am1anf
am1ang
am1ani
a1mann
aman1s
am1anv
a2mar.
am3ara
am3ar2f
am3arh
am3ari
am3arm
am3aro
am3ars
am1atí
a3matu
am1aum
2a1má2
a2m1ák
a3mál
a3mán
a3mát
am1áv
a2mb
am2bal
am2be
amb1er
1ambög
am1dv
2amei
ament1
3amerí
am1ers
am3eyk
a1mé
a2mf
a1mi2
am1ið.
a3miðj
am1iðn
amig1
am3ikv
2amil
am1ill
am1is2h1
am1ist
am1it
a1míd
am1íð.
am1íðh
am1ís
a1mít
a1mj
a2m1ja
am1já
a3mjó
a3mjú
a3mjö
amk2
a2ml
am3lu
a2mm
amma1l
amm1d2
amm1ís
amm1n
2amo
am1on
a3m2orf
a1mos
4amó
amó1k
am1ól
a2mp
ampa1s
am1pí
am1p2un
am3rá
a2ms
am1sa
1amsd
am3sk
am1sn
1amss
am1su
am1sv
am1tá
am1til
1amtm
a3m2uð2
a3mul
a3mun
amun2l3
a3mura
amur2l3
a3murt
a3mus
a1múl
am1úr
4amy
a2m1yg
a3myn
am1yrt
a3mæl
am1æs
am1ætt.
2amö
a3möm
a3mör
1an.
an1ada
an1adí
an2aðr
2anafn
an1afs
an1aft
2a1nag.
an1ak.
an1aki
an1ali
an1all
ana2na
an3ara
an2a1re
anar2k
an1as.
an1asb
an3a2s3l
an1at.
an1ate
an1atí
2a1nau
3anauk
1aná.
a2nák
aná1l
2anám
a2n1ár
a2n1át
2and.
an2da
an2de
an2d1j
and1nu
2ando
and1rey
an2drj
and1rjú
and1ru
ands4eyr
and3stí
2andu
an2dæ
2ane
3an1eg
an1ei
3aneld
a2n1en
an1er
a3nes
3a2n1ett
an1é
1anfe
1anfy
2anga.
3angei
an1gif
an1gj
an2gl
ang1lu
ang1lö
angn2a
ang1raf
an1gró
3angú
ang3v4a
2a1nib
2aniðu
ani1e
an3i2k
anik1e
an3il
an3i2m
anis2m1
1aní
an1íd
an1íe
an2íet
an1ík
an1íl
an1ís
an1ít
a2n1ja
anka1s
an2k1e
an2k1l
1ankó
an1kun
an2ký
1anl
a2nn
2annaf
2annag
2annal
2annas
ann1d
1annef
2ann1k
2ann3l2
2anns
ann2s1l
ann2sæð
ann2sæv
ann1t
2annu
an1næð
2ano
an1of
an1ok
an1on
an1orð
an1os
a1not
an1óki
an1ón
2a1nór
anó1s
2a1nót
ans1á
an2sel
an3sey
ans3iðu
1ansj
ans1kor
ans1li
an2s1ós
anst2
an3s2tö
an1s2u
an2sæð
an1tak
an1tei
an1tem
an1ten
ant1es
ant3ill
1antí
an1tór
1ants
ant2sk
an1t2v
1antý
1anu
2a1nud
an3ue
2anur
an1úa
an1úk
2anúm
a1núp
3an1úr
an1út
1anve
1anvo
2a1nyk
an1yr
2a1ný
an1ýf
2anz1
2a1næ
3an1æv
2a1nö
an1ök
a1o
aor2m
a1ó
1aóa
aó2b
aó2e
aó2f
a2ói
aó2j
